Tennessee, session 114, HB1074.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-1-171, is amended by deleting
subsection (b) and substituting:
(b) Except as provided in subsection (d), a provider shall notify a patient of
communication between the provider and the patient's health insurance entity if the
provider contacts the health insurance entity seeking additional information needed to
process a prior authorization request for the patient within seven (7) calendar days after
the communication has occurred. The notification must include a copy of the
communication.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 56-6-705(a), is amended by deleting
subdivision (4) and substituting:
(4) If a utilization review organization makes a request of the healthcare provider
that additional information is needed to process a prior authorization and the healthcare
provider does not submit the additional information within the seven-calendar-day
timeframe described under subsection (a), then the utilization review organization must
notify the enrollee that further information has been requested from the provider. The
notification must include a copy of the communication.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1074
003218
- 1 -